Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8140.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 169
LIMITATIONS ON IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT COOPERATION
42-169-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Federal immigration authority” means any officer, employee, or agent of a federal
agency charged with enforcement of civil immigration laws.
(2) “Immigration detainer” means a request from a federal immigration authority to
maintain custody of an individual for immigration enforcement purposes.
(3) “287(g) agreement” means any agreement authorized under 8 U.S.C. §1357(g)
delegating immigration enforcement powers to state or local officers.
(4) “Law enforcement agency” means any state or municipal law enforcement agency or
correctional facility in the State of Rhode Island.
42-169-2. Prohibition on 287(g) agreements.
No state or local law enforcement agency shall enter into, renew, or participate in a 287(g)
agreement or any substantially similar agreement delegating federal immigration enforcement
authority to a state or local law enforcement officer.

42-169-3. Detainers and administrative warrants.
No law enforcement agency shall arrest or detain an individual based solely on an
immigration detainer or administrative warrant.
42-169-4. Use of resources.
No law enforcement agency shall use funds, personnel, property, or equipment to
investigate, interrogate, or detain a person solely for civil immigration enforcement.
42-169-5. Exceptions.
Nothing in this chapter prohibits cooperation related to criminal investigations unrelated to
immigration status or compliance with a valid judicial warrant or order.
42-169-6. Records and transparency.
Law enforcement agencies shall document any request from a federal immigration
authority and publish annual statistics on the number and type of requests received.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005913
========
LC005913 - Page 2 of 3